Utah statutes.
58-16a-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501:

(1)  buying, selling, or fraudulently obtaining, any optometry diploma, license, certificate, or registration;

(2)  aiding or abetting the buying, selling, or fraudulently obtaining, of any optometry diploma, license, certificate, or registration;

(3)  selling or providing contact lenses or ophthalmic lenses in a manner inconsistent with Section 58-16a-801 or intentionally altering a prescription unless the person selling or providing the lenses is a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist; or

(4)  representing oneself as or using the title of "optometrist," "optometric physician," "doctor of optometry," or "O.D.," unless currently licensed under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2012 General Session

